New York, session 2025-2026, A6947.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 259-b of the executive law, as 2 amended by section 38-a of subpart A of part C of chapter 62 of the laws 3 of 2011, is amended to read as follows: 4 1. There shall be in the department a state board of parole which 5 shall possess the powers and duties hereinafter specified. The board 6 shall function independently of the department regarding all of its 7 decision-making functions, as well as any other powers and duties speci- 8 fied in this article, provided, however, that administrative matters of 9 general applicability within the department shall be applicable to the 10 board. Such board shall consist of not more than nineteen members 11 appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate. The 12 term of office of each member of such board shall be for six years; 13 provided, however, that any member chosen to fill a vacancy occurring 14 otherwise than by expiration of term shall be appointed for the remain- 15 der of the unexpired term of the member whom [he is] they are to 16 succeed. In the event of a vacancy occurring during an adjournment of 17 the senate, the governor may make an interim appointment to fill such 18 vacancy, which shall be reviewed by the senate upon reconvening and 19 shall either be confirmed to a full appointment or removed at such time. 20 In the event of the inability to act of any member, the governor may 21 appoint some competent informed person to act in [his] their stead 22 during the continuance of such disability. 23 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10766-01-5